Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3957.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.70, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Powers and duties. The council must review applications and deleted text begin selectdeleted text end new text begin submit recommendations ofnew text end projects to receive agricultural fertilizer research and education program grants, as authorized in section 18C.71. The council must deleted text begin establish a program to providedeleted text end new text begin submit recommendations to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and policy fornew text end grants to research, education, and technology transfer projects related to agricultural fertilizer, soil amendments, and plant amendments. For the purpose of this section, "fertilizer" includes soil amendments and plant amendments, but does not include vegetable or animal manures that are not manipulated. The commissioner is responsible for all deleted text begin fiscal anddeleted text end administrative duties. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.71, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Awarding grants. Applications for program grants must be submitted in the form prescribed by the Minnesota Agricultural Fertilizer Research and Education Council. Applications must be submitted on or before the deadline prescribed by the council. All applications are subject to a thorough in-state review by a peer committee established and approved by the council. Each project meeting the basic qualifications is subject to a yes or no vote by each council member. Projects deleted text begin chosendeleted text end new text begin submitted as recommendations to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and policynew text end to receive funding must achieve an affirmative vote from at least ten of the 15 council members or two-thirds of voting members present. Projects awarded program funds must submit an annual progress report in the form prescribed by the council. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.80, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Account; appropriation. An agricultural fertilizer research and education account is established in the agricultural fund. Money in the account, including interest earned, is deleted text begin appropriated to the commissionerdeleted text end for grants deleted text begin determined by the Minnesota Agricultural Fertilizer Research and Education Councildeleted text end under section 18C.71. deleted text begin The commissioner may use up to $80,000 each fiscal year for direct costs incurred to provide fiscal and administrative support to the council as required under section 18C.70, subdivision 2. The commissioner may also recover associated indirect costs from the account as required under section 16A.127.deleted text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41A.14, is amended to read: 41A.14 AGRICULTURE RESEARCH, EDUCATION, EXTENSION, AND TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER GRANT PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Duties; grants. The agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer grant program is created. The purpose of the grant program is to provide investments that will most efficiently achieve long-term agricultural productivity increases through improved infrastructure, vision, and accountability. The scope and intent of the grants, to the extent possible, shall provide for long-term base funding that allows the grantee to continue the functions of the research, education, extension, and technology transfer efforts to a practical conclusion. Priority for grants shall be given to human infrastructure. The commissioner shall deleted text begin providedeleted text end new text begin make recommendations to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and policy fornew text end grants for: (1) agricultural research, extension, and technology transfer needs at the University of Minnesota for use by any of the following: (i) the College of Food, Agricultural and Natural Resource Sciences; (ii) the Minnesota Agricultural Experiment Station; (iii) the University of Minnesota Extension Service; (iv) the University of Minnesota Veterinary School; (v) the Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory; or (vi) the Stakman-Borlaug Center; (2) agriculture rapid response for plant and animal diseases and pests; and (3) agricultural education including but not limited to the Minnesota Agriculture Education Leadership Council, farm business management, mentoring programs, graduate debt forgiveness, and high school programs. Subd. 2. Advisory panel. (a) In deleted text begin awardingdeleted text end new text begin submitting recommendations fornew text end grants under this section, the commissioner and a representative of the College of Food, Agricultural and Natural Resource Sciences at the University of Minnesota must consult with an advisory panel consisting of the following stakeholders: (1) a representative of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities system; (2) a representative of the Minnesota Farm Bureau; (3) a representative of the Minnesota Farmers Union; (4) a person representing agriculture industry statewide; (5) a representative of each of the state commodity councils organized under section 17.54 and the Minnesota Pork Board; (6) a person representing an association of primary manufacturers of forest products; (7) a person representing organic or sustainable agriculture; (8) a person representing statewide environment and natural resource conservation organizations; and (9) a person representing the interests of Minnesota Tribal governments as defined in section 10.65, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (4). (b) Members under paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (3) and (5), shall be chosen by their respective organizations. The member under paragraph (a), clause (9), may be appointed by the Minnesota Indian Affairs Council at the council's discretion. Subd. 3. Account. An agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer account is created in the agricultural fund in the state treasury. The account consists of money received in the form of gifts, grants, reimbursement, or appropriations from any source for any of the purposes provided in subdivision 1, and any interest or earnings of the account. deleted text begin Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner of agriculture for the purposes under subdivision 1.deleted text end Sec. 5. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective July 1, 2027. new text end